Utah statutes.
48-1d-1305.   Limit of one profession.

(1)  A professional services partnership organized to provide a professional service under this part may provide only:

(a)  one specific type of professional service; and

(b)  services ancillary to the professional service described in Subsection (1)(a).

(2)  A professional services partnership organized to provide a professional service under this part may not engage in a business other than to provide:

(a)  the professional service that it was organized to provide; and

(b)  services ancillary to the professional service described in Subsection (2)(a).

(3)  Notwithstanding Subsections (1) and (2), a professional services partnership may:

(a)  own real and personal property necessary or appropriate for providing the type of professional service it was organized to provide; and

(b)  invest the professional services partnership's money in one or more of the following:

(i)  real estate;

(ii)  mortgages;

(iii)  stocks;

(vi)  bonds; or

(v)  another type of investment.



Enacted by Chapter 412, 2013 General Session

